Arkansas, session 2025, SB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas - Division of Agriculture for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
DIVISION OF AGRICULTURE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Vice-Pres. for Agriculture/Chance. 1 $281,159
(2) Senior Associate Vice President 2 $247,681
(3) Associate VP 6 $242,035
(4) District Director 3 $223,888
*HAR041*
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
(5) Assistant VP 6 $211,785
(6) Project/Program Administrator 170
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
Executive Assistant $115,000
(7) IT Pool 20
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(8) County Ext. Agent 210
County Ext. Agent IV $199,779
County Ext. Agent III $193,119
County Ext. Agent II $134,719
County Ext. Agent I $124,874
(9) Resident Director in Charge 6 $157,351
(10) Associate for Administration 4 $106,139
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
(11) Fiscal Support Pool 28
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(12) Procurement Coordinator 1 $81,860
(13) Research Technologist 9 $81,860
(14) Skilled Trades Pool 5
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(15) Human Resources Analyst 1 $72,774
(16) Maintenance Coordinator 3 $72,774
(17) Assistant Director of Farming 1 $69,975
(18) Buyer 2 $69,975
(19) HEI Program Coordinator 3 $69,975
(20) Administrative Support Pool 143
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(21) Benefits Analyst 1 $67,284
(22) Maintenance Supervisor 3 $67,284
(23) Payroll Services Specialist 2 $67,284
(24) Print Shop Supervisor 1 $67,284
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
(25) Institutional Printer 2 $64,696
(26) Inventory Control Manager 1 $64,696
(27) Human Resources Specialist 3 $62,208
(28) Farm Foreman - Inst. 6 $59,815
(29) Maintenance Specialist 8 $59,815
(30) Research Assistant 1 $59,815
(31) Special Events Coordinator 1 $59,815
(32) Coordinator of Housekeeping 1 $57,515
(33) Equipment Mechanic 2 $55,302
(34) Farm Maintenance Mechanic 2 $55,302
(35) Laboratory Technician 11 $55,302
(36) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
(37) Special Events Supervisor 1 $55,302
(38) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(39) Greenhouse Technician 1 $53,175
(40) Heavy Equipment Operator 1 $53,175
(41) Research Technician 10 $53,175
(42) CES Program Assistant 36 $51,130
(43) Maintenance Assistant 2 $51,130
(44) Research Field Technician 9 $51,130
(45) Agriculture Farm Technician 6 $47,272
(46) Agriculture Lab Technician 16 $47,272
(47) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
(48) Institutional Services Assistant 6 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(49) Faculty 190
Distinguished Professor $273,692
University Professor $253,548
Professor $234,194
Associate Professor $199,779
Assistant Professor $189,024
Curator $159,536
Instructor $134,719
(50) Department Chairperson 11 $239,218
(51) Research Scientist 10 $174,281
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
(52) Program Associate 165 $159,536
(53) Senior Graduate Assistant 60 $126,328
(54) Post Doctoral Fellow 45 $126,046
(55) Program Technician 120 $106,136
(56) Program Assistant 8 $100,908
(57) Graduate Assistant 77 $69,636
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(58) Faculty 25
Distinguished Professor $235,631
University Professor $230,254
Professor $221,287
Associate Professor $189,024
Assistant Professor $183,233
Instructor $121,805
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,471

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas - Division of Agriculture for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: seven hundred (700) temporary or part-time employees, when needed,
at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
University of Arkansas Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the University of Arkansas - Division of Agriculture for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $51,095,780
(02) EXTRA HELP 350,000
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
(03) OVERTIME 5,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,468,993
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 19,204,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $85,373,773

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as defined by
Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the
University of Arkansas - Division of Agriculture for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $20,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 4,500,000
(03) OVERTIME 60,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 6,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 27,700,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,400,000
(C) PROF. FEES 2,200,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 10,500,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 46,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 100,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 20,000
(09) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 60,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $119,540,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - SOIL TESTING AND RESEARCH.
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable
from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services
and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas - Soil Testing and
Research Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $991,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 90,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 280,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 675,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 17,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 495,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 540,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,113,000

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PINE TREE
RESEARCH STATION.
(a) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas shall not sell
the property commonly known as the Pine Tree Research Station, located in St.
Francis County, Arkansas, which was acquired by the Board of Trustees of the
University of Arkansas from the United States of America acting through the
Forest Service in 1978, to a private entity or individual.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas may sell the
property commonly known as the Pine Tree Research Station, located in St.
Francis County, Arkansas, which was acquired by the Board of Trustees of the
University of Arkansas from the United States of America acting through the
Forest Service in 1978, to:
(1) A non-profit corporation organized with the primary mission
to keep the land open to the public and available for public use; and
(2) Organized and operated for a minimum of five (5) years.
(c) The property commonly known as the Pine Tree Research Station,
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124
located in St. Francis County, Arkansas, which was acquired by the Board of
Trustees of the University of Arkansas from the United States of America
acting through the Forest Service in 1978, shall remain open to the public
for public use, including without limitation:
(1) Public fishing;
(2) Public hunting;
(3) Biking;
(4) Bird watching; and
(5) Hiking.
(d) All property commonly known as the Pine Tree Research Station,
located in St. Francis County, Arkansas, which was acquired by the Board of
Trustees of the University of Arkansas from the United States of America
acting through the Forest Service in 1978, in row crop cultivation in the
year 2020 is exempt from subsection (c) of this section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.
03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB124

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee






















03-10-2025 15:51:35 HAR041